Ohio, session 136, SB404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The eighth day of October is designated as "Jesse Jackson Day" in recognition of Jesse Jackson, the civil rights activist who was born on that day in 1941.